Maryland, session 2026, HB0802.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Courts and Judicial Proceedings
10–405.
(a) Except as provided in [subsection] SUBSECTIONS (b) AND (C) of this section,
whenever any wire, oral, or electronic communication has been intercepted, no part of the
contents of the communication and no evidence derived therefrom may be received in
evidence in any trial, hearing, or other proceeding in or before any court, grand jury,
department, officer, agency, regulatory body, legislative committee, or other authority of
this State, or a political subdivision thereof if the disclosure of that information would be
in violation of this subtitle.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0802*

HOUSE BILL 802
(b) If any wire, oral, or electronic communication is intercepted in any state or
any political subdivision of a state, the United States or any territory, protectorate, or
possession of the United States, including the District of Columbia in accordance with the
law of that jurisdiction, but that would be in violation of this subtitle if the interception was
made in this State, the contents of the communication and evidence derived from the
communication may be received in evidence in any trial, hearing, or other proceeding in or
before any court, grand jury, department, officer, agency, regulatory body, legislative
committee, or other authority of this State, or any political subdivision of this State if:
(1) At least one of the parties to the communication was outside the State
during the communication;
(2) The interception was not made as part of or in furtherance of an
investigation conducted by or on behalf of law enforcement officials of this State; and
(3) All parties to the communication were co–conspirators in a crime of
violence as defined in § 14–101 of the Criminal Law Article.
(C) (1) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, IF ANY WIRE,
ORAL, OR ELECTRONIC COMMUNICATION HAS BEEN INTERCEPTED, THE CONTENTS
OF THE COMMUNICATION AND EVIDENCE DERIVED FROM THE COMMUNICATION
MAY BE RECEIVED IN EVIDENCE IN ANY CRIMINAL OR CIVIL TRIAL OR HEARING IN
THE DISTRICT COURT OR A CIRCUIT COURT IF THE COURT DETERMINES THAT:
(I) THE CONTENTS OF THE COMMUNICATION AND EVIDENCE
DERIVED FROM THE COMMUNICATION ARE OFFERED AS EVIDENCE OF A MATERIAL
FACT;
(II) THE INTERCEPTION WAS NOT MADE AS PART OF OR IN
FURTHERANCE OF AN INVESTIGATION CONDUCTED BY OR ON BEHALF OF LAW
ENFORCEMENT OFFICIALS OF THIS STATE;
(III) THE CONTENTS OF THE COMMUNICATION AND EVIDENCE
DERIVED FROM THE COMMUNICATION ARE MORE PROBATIVE ON THE POINT FOR
WHICH THEY ARE OFFERED THAN ANY OTHER EVIDENCE THAT THE PROPONENT CAN
PROCURE THROUGH REASONABLE EFFORTS; AND
(IV) THE INTEREST OF JUSTICE WILL BE BEST SERVED BY THE
ADMISSION INTO EVIDENCE OF THE CONTENTS OF THE COMMUNICATION AND
EVIDENCE DERIVED FROM THE COMMUNICATION.
(2) THE CONTENTS OF A COMMUNICATION AND EVIDENCE DERIVED
FROM THE COMMUNICATION MAY NOT BE RECEIVED IN EVIDENCE UNDER
PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION UNLESS THE PROPONENT PROVIDES THE

HOUSE BILL 802 3
ADVERSE PARTY, SUFFICIENTLY IN ADVANCE OF THE TRIAL OR HEARING TO ALLOW
THE ADVERSE PARTY A FAIR OPPORTUNITY TO PREPARE, WITH:
(I) NOTICE OF THE INTENTION TO OFFER THE CONTENTS OF
THE COMMUNICATION AND EVIDENCE DERIVED FROM THE COMMUNICATION; AND
(II) THE NAME AND ADDRESS OF THE PARTY WHOSE
COMMUNICATION WAS INTERCEPTED.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.